North Carolina, session 2025, SB1042.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. WEB AND MOBILE BASED COMMUNICATION PLATFORM FOR USE IN
CHILD WELFARE CASES
SECTION 1.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services the sum of two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in
recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the Office of Indigent
Defense Services to contract with an approved vendor, no later than October 1, 2026, for the
implementation of a secure web and mobile based communications platform to ensure
compliance with federal and State requirements for the following:
(1) Advanced notification via automated electronic methods such as text
messaging or email to all parties and their attorneys, to the persons providing
care to the juvenile, and to any other person or agency designated by the court
for all court hearings and for interagency team meetings initiated by the
county department of social services such as permanency planning review
meetings, child and family team meetings, and placement status change
meetings.
(2) Enhanced communication between attorneys and clients and between parties
to reduce court continuances, share discovery, and reduce barriers to
permanency.
SECTION 1.2. The Administrative Office of the Courts, Indigent Services of North
Carolina, the Guardian Ad Litem Program, and the Division of Social Services of the North
Carolina Department of Health and Human Services shall enter into a data sharing agreement to
enable the vendor selected pursuant to Section 1.1 of this act to receive the data necessary to
ensure timely notification of court hearings and interagency team meetings and to ensure the
platform receives accurate information.
SECTION 1.3. Section 1.1 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. Section 1.2
of this act becomes effective when it becomes law.



PART II. SPORTS WAGERING/LOTTERY CHANGES
SECTION 2.1. G.S. 105-113.128(1) reads as rewritten:
*S1042-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(1) Two One hundred four million dollars ($2,000,000) ($104,000,000) annually
to the Department of Health and Human Services for Services, to be used as
follows:
a. Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for gambling addiction education
and treatment programs.
b. Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for child welfare and foster
care services.
c. Seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) for child-care services."
SECTION 2.2. The Department of Health and Human Services shall use the funds
credited as provided in G.S. 105-113.128(1), as amended by Section 2.1 of this act, to annually
provide the following:
(1) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for gambling addiction education and
treatment programs.
(2) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) to be used for child welfare and
foster care services including:
a. Reimbursement for home inspections required to obtain and maintain
foster home and therapeutic foster home licensure.
b. Reimbursement for training required to obtain and maintain licensure
as a therapeutic foster parent.
c. Reimbursement for items needed by a child at the child's initial
placement. Such items include school supplies, toiletries, clothing,
diapers, and other items to assist in the transition, and which should be
chosen with the child's input when possible. Reimbursement shall be
up to two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for children through five years
of age and up to five hundred dollars ($500) for children from six years
of age.
d. Emergency placement.
(3) Seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) to be used for child-care services
including:
a. Increasing the child-care subsidy market rates to the seventy-fifth
percentile as recommended by the 2023 Child Care Market Rate Study
for children in three-, four-, and five-star-rated child care centers and
homes.
b. Extension of the Tri-Share Child-Care program established by S.L.
2023-134 and amended by S.L. 2024-34.
c. Increasing child-care providers inclusive of extending and expanding
the in-home child-care pilot program established by S.L. 2023-134.
SECTION 2.3. G.S. 18C-162(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The Commission shall allocate revenues to the North Carolina State Lottery Fund in
order to increase and maximize the available revenues for education purposes, and to the extent
practicable, shall adhere to the following guidelines:
(1) At least fifty percent (50%) of the total annual revenues, as described in this
Chapter, shall be returned to the public in the form of prizes.
(2) At least thirty-eight percent (38%) of the total annual revenues, as described
in this Chapter, shall be transferred as provided in G.S. 18C-164.
(3) No more than five percent (5%) of the total annual revenues, as described in
this Chapter, shall be allocated for payment of expenses of the Lottery.
(4) No more than seven percent (7%) of the face value of tickets or shares, as
described in this Chapter, shall be allocated for compensation paid to lottery
game retailers."
Page 2 Senate Bill 1042-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.4. The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt or
amend any rules, policies, or procedures necessary to give effect to Sections 2.1 and 2.2 of this
act.
SECTION 2.5. Sections 2.1 and 2.2 of this act become effective July 1, 2026, and
apply to net proceeds credited on or after that date. Section 2.3 of this act becomes effective July
1, 2026.

PART III. PLAN FOR IMPLEMENTATION OF STATEWIDE FLOOR
SECTION 3. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education (Division), shall develop a plan for implementing a statewide
child care subsidy reimbursement rate floor. The Division shall submit a report with their
recommended plan no later than December 1, 2026 to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective when it
becomes law.
Senate Bill 1042-First Edition Page 3